Tennessee, session 114, SB0987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 42, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A motor vehicle on which an eligible military or memorial license plate
described by subsection (b) is displayed is exempt from the payment of an airport
parking fee collected or charged by an authority other than a branch of the federal
government, when being operated by or for the transportation of:
(1) An owner or lessee of the vehicle; or
(2) A disabled veteran, as described in § 55-4-256 or § 55-4-277.
(b) The following are eligible military or memorial license plates:
(1) Congressional Medal of Honor, under § 55-4-258;
(2) Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, Air Force Cross, Silver
Star, Distinguished Flying Cross, Bronze Star (Valor), or Air Medal (Valor), under
§ 55-4-259;
(3) Holder of the Purple Heart, under § 55-4-257;
(4) Disabled Veteran, under § 55-4-256;
(5) Disabled Veteran (service-connected), under § 55-4-277;
(6) Former Prisoner of War, under § 55-4-261;
(7) Bronze Star (Meritorious) or Air Medal (Meritorious), under § 55-4-
260;
SB0987
000502
- 1 -

(8) Legion of Merit, under § 55-4-275; and
(9) A disabled veteran license plate issued by another state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 42, Chapter 4, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) A motor vehicle on which an eligible military or memorial license plate
described by subsection (b) is displayed is exempt from the payment of an airport
parking fee collected or charged by an authority other than a branch of the federal
government, when being operated by or for the transportation of:
(1) An owner or lessee of the vehicle; or
(2) A disabled veteran, as described in § 55-4-256 or § 55-4-277.
(b) The following are eligible military or memorial license plates:
(1) Congressional Medal of Honor, under § 55-4-258;
(2) Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, Air Force Cross, Silver
Star, Distinguished Flying Cross, Bronze Star (Valor), or Air Medal (Valor), under
§ 55-4-259;
(3) Holder of the Purple Heart, under § 55-4-257;
(4) Disabled Veteran, under § 55-4-256;
(5) Disabled Veteran (service-connected), under § 55-4-277;
(6) Former Prisoner of War, under § 55-4-261;
(7) Bronze Star (Meritorious) or Air Medal (Meritorious), under § 55-4-
260;
(8) Legion of Merit, under § 55-4-275; and
(9) A disabled veteran license plate issued by another state.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 42, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
- 2 - 000502

(a) A motor vehicle on which an eligible military or memorial license plate
described by subsection (b) is displayed is exempt from the payment of an airport
parking fee collected or charged by an authority other than a branch of the federal
government, when being operated by or for the transportation of:
(1) An owner or lessee of the vehicle; or
(2) A disabled veteran, as described in § 55-4-256 or § 55-4-277.
(b) The following are eligible military or memorial license plates:
(1) Congressional Medal of Honor, under § 55-4-258;
(2) Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, Air Force Cross, Silver
Star, Distinguished Flying Cross, Bronze Star (Valor), or Air Medal (Valor), under
§ 55-4-259;
(3) Holder of the Purple Heart, under § 55-4-257;
(4) Disabled Veteran, under § 55-4-256;
(5) Disabled Veteran (service-connected), under § 55-4-277;
(6) Former Prisoner of War, under § 55-4-261;
(7) Bronze Star (Meritorious) or Air Medal (Meritorious), under § 55-4-
260;
(8) Legion of Merit, under § 55-4-275; and
(9) A disabled veteran license plate issued by another state.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-10-109(e), is amended by
deleting the language "except as expressly provided in this chapter" and substituting instead the
language "except as expressly provided in this chapter or in Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000502